Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB426.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 210 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) 1. "Mental health professional" means:
a. A physician licensed under KRS Chapter 311 or a medical
officer of the government of the United States engaged in
conducting mental health services;
b. A psychiatrist licensed under KRS Chapter 311 or a medical
officer of the government of the United States engaged in
conducting mental health services;
c. A psychologist, psychological practitioner, certified psychologist,
or psychological associate licensed under KRS Chapter 319;
d. A psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, certified nurse
practitioner or clinical nurse specialist with a psychiatric or
mental health population focus who is licensed under KRS
Chapter 314 to engage in advanced practice nursing;
e. A licensed clinical social worker licensed or a certified social
worker licensed under KRS Chapter 335;
f. A marriage and family therapist licensed under KRS Chapter
335 or a marriage and family therapy associate holding a permit
under KRS Chapter 335;
g. A licensed professional clinical counselor or a licensed
professional counselor associate credentialed under KRS
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 12/9/2024 2:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 238
Chapter 335;
h. A licensed pastoral counselor licensed under KRS Chapter 335;
i. A licensed professional art therapist certified under KRS
Chapter 309;
j. A physician assistant licensed under KRS Chapter 311 engaged
in providing mental health services; and
k. A licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor, licensed clinical
alcohol and drug counselor associate, or certified alcohol and
drug counselor licensed or certified under KRS Chapter 309.
2. "Mental health professional" does not mean a faith-based leader who
is not also a professional included in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph;
(b) "Public funds" means any money, regardless of the original source of the
money, of:
1. The Commonwealth of Kentucky, and any department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
2. Any county, city, or special district, and any department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof; and
3. Any other political subdivision of the Commonwealth, and any
department, agency, or instrumentality thereof; and
(c) "Sexual orientation and gender identity change efforts":
1. Means any practice or treatment that seeks to change an individual's
sexual orientation or gender identity, including efforts to:
a. Change behaviors or gender expressions; or
b. Eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic attractions or feelings
toward individuals of the same gender;
2. Includes but is not limited to practices known as:
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 12/9/2024 2:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 238
a. "Conversion therapy";
b. "Reparative therapy";
c. "Aversion therapy";
d. "Reorientation therapy"; and
e. "Sexual orientation change efforts";
and other forms of treatment using shaming, emotionally traumatic,
or physically painful stimuli to change an individual's sexual
orientation or gender identity; and
3. Does not include:
a. Counseling that provides assistance to a person undergoing
gender transition; or
b. Counseling that provides acceptance, support, and
understanding of a person or facilitates a person's coping, social
support, and identity exploration and development, including
sexual-orientation-neutral interventions to prevent or address
unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, as long as such
counseling does not seek to change an individual's sexual
orientation or gender identity.
(2) A mental health professional shall not engage in or refer a patient under eighteen
(18) years of age, a person who is eighteen (18) years or older who is an adult as
defined in KRS 209.020, or a ward as defined in KRS 387.510 for sexual
orientation and gender identity change efforts.
(3) Any violation of subsection (2) of this section shall be considered unprofessional
conduct indicating incompetence and deceptive practice and shall subject the
mental health professional to discipline by the appropriate professional
certification or licensing board.
(4) Public funds shall not be directly or indirectly used, granted, paid, or distributed
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 12/9/2024 2:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 238
to any entity, organization, or individual that provides sexual orientation and
gender identity change efforts.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 211 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "sexual orientation and gender identity change efforts"
has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) The Department for Public Health and the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities in the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services shall:
(a) Develop and produce educational materials regarding sexual orientation
and gender identity change efforts, the health risks and emotional trauma
inflicted by the practice of sexual orientation and gender identity change
efforts, and any possible professional discipline that may be imposed for
providing sexual orientation and gender identity change efforts; and
(b) Disseminate the educational materials produced under paragraph (a) of this
subsection to mental health and health care providers, teachers and
educational personnel, entities serving youth in foster care, and any other
professionals or community entities who serve youth or who may reasonably
be expected to come into contact with individuals who may provide sexual
orientation and gender identity change efforts or be affected by sexual
orientation and gender identity change efforts.
(3) The department may consult or contract with nonprofit organizations to develop
and produce the educational materials required by subsection (2) of this section.
Section 3. This Act may be cited as the Youth Mental Health Protection Act.
Section 4. Whereas peer-reviewed studies and numerous professional
organizations have concluded that sexual orientation and gender identity change efforts
can pose critical health risks to lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender people, ranging
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 12/9/2024 2:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 238
from depression to substance use to suicidal thoughts, attempts, and completed suicide,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval
by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 12/9/2024 2:45 PM Jacketed